Massachusetts, session 194th, H2842.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 94 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the words “Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority”, the
following words: -
“or the police force of the University of Massachusetts, or of the police force of the
Massachusetts Port Authority, or of the police forces of the state universities and community
colleges, or of the office of environmental law enforcement of the Executive Office of
Environmental Affairs, or the campus police of the Department of Mental Health,”
of 1